Washington statutes.
RCW 19.225.901

Application—Construction—2002 c 131.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter of this chapter among states that enact it.

[ 2002 c 131 s 14.]